Georgia, session 2025_26, HB720.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to reconstitute the Board of Education of Lee County, approved April 9, 1993
(Ga. L. 1993, p. 5130), as amended, is amended by revising Section 6 as follows:
"SECTION 6.
Members of the Board of Education of Lee County shall be compensated in the amount
of $175.00 per month. Members of the board, including the chairperson, as approved by
the board, shall be reimbursed for the actual expenses necessarily incurred for attending
meetings and nonathletic events in the performance of their official duties for the Lee
County School District."
H. B. 720
- 1 -

LC 47 3224/AP
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on the first day of the month following the month in which
it is approved by the Governor or in which it becomes law without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 720
- 2 -